North Dakota, session 69, SB2287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-28-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-28-02. Video livestock auction market and internet auction - Authority to transact
business.
A video livestock auction market or internet livestock auction market may not transact business in
this state unless the market transacts business through a representative licensed under this chapter.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Sections 4.1-28-03 and 4.1-28-04 of the North Dakota Century Code are
repealed.

S. B. NO. 2287 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2287.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State